Massachusetts, session 194th, S870.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 13D of Chapter 118E of the general laws is amended after the
second paragraph by inserting the following new paragraph:-
Such rates for home health and continuous skilled nursing agencies, as defined under
section 51K of chapter 111, shall be established and reviewed at least biennially. In setting such
rates, the executive office shall use as base year costs for rate determination purposes the
reported costs of the calendar year not more than 4 years prior to the current rate year, adjusted
for reasonableness and to incorporate any new regulatory costs imposed since said base year
costs. In establishing rates of payment to home health agencies, the executive office shall
consider all costs which must be incurred by efficiently and economically operated providers.
of 3

The rates shall also include an allowance for reasonable administrative expenses and a
reasonable profit factor, as determined by the executive office. Such cost analysis shall include,
but not be limited to, the following: costs of similar services provided in other care settings; use
of national or regional indices to measure increases or decreases in reasonable costs incurred
since the base year costs; the revision of existing historical cost bases, where applicable, to
reflect changing norms or models of efficient service delivery; and other means to encourage the
cost-efficient delivery of services. The Secretary shall, concurrent with the completion of setting
such rates, provide a report to the house and senate committees on ways and means detailing
how the rates issued under this paragraph were analyzed and revised; provided further, that the
report shall compare the inflationary considerations made in the adopted rate with the most
recent “Home Health Agency Market Basket” index posted by the United States Department of
Health and Human Services, Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services; provided further, that
if the adopted rate does not rely on the “Home Health Agency Market Basket” index for the
purpose of determining inflationary adjustments, then the report will simulate what the rate
would have been if such index was a factor in rate development. In determining the methodology
for setting rates, the Secretary shall consult with stakeholders impacted by the rates.
SECTION 2. Section 4 of Chapter 19A is hereby amended by adding after Section 4D the
following new section:
Section 4E. In establishing rates of payment pursuant to the second paragraph of section
13C of chapter 118E of the M.G.L., the executive office shall consider changes to the state
minimum wage or changes to employer payroll tax obligations as governmental mandates that
affect the costs of providing homemaker and personal care homemaker services to elderly clients
under this section.
of 3

The executive office shall also consider and analyze rates of payment and wages
associated with providing similar services in both the public and private settings. In calculating
operating costs, the executive office shall consider costs of; health insurance, employee benefits
and training, payroll taxes, technology costs, administrative allocation and staff salaries using the
latest available national or regional indices and benchmarked to the latest available Bureau of
Labor Statistics median wage data. Nothing in this section shall be construed as limiting
consideration of other governmental mandates or operating costs that affect the cost of providing
services pursuant to section 4 of chapter 19A of the General Laws. In determining the
methodology for setting rates, the Secretary shall consult with stakeholders impacted by the
rates.
The Secretary of Elder Affairs shall, concurrent with the promulgation of the final rates
of payment for services under section 4 of chapter 19A, issue a report to the House and Senate
committees on ways and means detailing how the rates promulgated were analyzed and
determined in compliance with the provisions set forth in the second paragraph of section 13C of
chapter 118E of the General Laws. The report shall detail the department’s analysis of changes in
the costs of providing homemaker and personal care homemaker services since the immediately
preceding rate determination; provided further, that the report shall compare the inflationary
considerations made in the adopted rate with the most recent “Home Health Agency Market
Basket” index posted by the United States Department of Health and Human Services, Centers
for Medicare and Medicaid Services; provided further, that if the adopted rate does not rely on
the “Home Health Agency Market Basket” index for the purpose of determining inflationary
adjustments, then the report will simulate what the rate would have been if such index was a
factor in rate development.
of 3